en: Router Accessories
xx: Router Accessories
cs: Příslušenství k frézkám
da: Fræser tilbehør
de: Zubehör für Oberfräsen
es: Accesorios para fresadora
fr: Accessoires pour défonceuses
it: Accessori fresatrici verticali
ja: ルーター関連用品
nl: Kantenfreesaccessoires
no: Fresetilbehør
pl: Akcesoria do frezarek pionowych
pt: Acessórios para tupias
ru: Принадлежности для фрезерования
sv: Tillbehör till handöverfräsar
tr: Freze Aksesuarları

en: Router Bits
xx: Router Bits
cs: Frézy
da: Fræsejern
de: Oberfräsenteile
es: Brocas fresadoras
fr: Fraises
it: Punte fresatrici verticali
ja: ルータービット
nl: Kantenfreesbitjes
no: Fresehoder
pl: Frezy do frezarek pionowych
pt: Brocas para máquinas de desbastar
ru: Фасонные фрезы
sv: Borr till handöverfräs
tr: Freze Uçları

en: Router Tables
xx: Router Tables
cs: Vertikální frézky
da: Savebænke
de: Oberfräsentische
es: Mesas fresadoras
fr: Tables de défonceuse
it: Tavoli fresatrici verticali
ja: ルーターテーブル
nl: Kantenfreesmachines
no: Fresebord
pl: Stoły do frezarek pionowych
pt: Mesas para máquinas de desbastar
ru: Фрезерные столы
sv: Bord till handöverfräs
tr: Freze Tezgahları

en: Sanding Accessories
xx: Sanding Accessories
cs: Příslušenství pro ruční broušení
da: Slibning med sandpapir – tilbehør
de: Schleifzubehör
es: Accesorios de lijar
fr: Accessoires de ponçage
it: Accessori per carteggio
ja: ヤスリ関連用品
nl: Schuuraccessoires
no: Pussetilbehør
pl: Akcesoria do szlifowania
pt: Acessórios para lixamento
ru: Принадлежности для шлифовки
sv: Tillbehör till slippapper
tr: Zımparalama Aksesuarları

en: Sandpaper & Sanding Sponges
xx: Sandpaper & Sanding Sponges
cs: Smirkové papíry a brusné houby
da: Sandpapir og slibesvampe
de: Schleifpapier & Schleifschwämme
es: Papel y esponjas de lija
fr: Papier de verre et éponges à poncer
it: Carta vetrata e spugne carteggio
ja: 紙ヤスリ・スポンジヤスリ
nl: Schuurpapier en schuursponzen
no: Sandpapir og pussesvamper
pl: Papier ścierny i gąbki ścierne
pt: Esponjas abrasivas para lixas e lixamento
ru: Наждачная бумага и шлифовальные губки
sv: Slippapper och slipsvamp
tr: Zımpara ve Zımparalama Süngerleri

en: Saw Accessories
xx: Saw Accessories
cs: Příslušenství k pilám
da: Sav – tilbehør
de: Sägenzubehör
es: Accesorios para sierras
fr: Accessoires pour scies
it: Accessori per seghe
ja: のこぎり関連用品
nl: Accessoires voor zagen
no: Sagtilbehør
pl: Akcesoria do pił
pt: Acessórios para serras
ru: Принадлежности для пил
sv: Sågtillbehör
tr: Testere Aksesuarları

en: Band Saw Accessories
xx: Band Saw Accessories
cs: Příslušenství k pásovým pilám
da: Tilbehør til båndsave
de: Bandsägenzubehör
es: Accesorios para sierras de cinta
fr: Accessoires pour scies à ruban
it: Accessori per seghe a nastro
ja: バンドソー関連用品
nl: Accessoires voor lintzagen
no: Tilbehør til båndsag
pl: Akcesoria do pił taśmowych
pt: Acessórios para serra de fita
ru: Принадлежности для ленточных пил
sv: Bandsågstillbehör
tr: Şerit Testere Aksesuarları

en: Handheld Circular Saw Accessories
xx: Handheld Circular Saw Accessories
cs: Příslušenství ke kotoučovým pilám
da: Tilbehør til håndholdte rundsave
de: Handkreissägen-Zubehör
es: Accesorios para sierras circulares de mano
fr: Accessoires pour scies circulaires portatives
it: Accessori per seghe circolari manuali
ja: 電動丸のこ関連用品
nl: Accessoires voor handcirkelzagen
no: Tilbehør til håndholdte sirkelsager
pl: Akcesoria do ręcznych pilarek tarczowych
pt: Acessórios para serra circular de mão
ru: Принадлежности для ручных циркулярных пил
sv: Tillbehör till handhållna cirkelsågar
tr: El Tipi Dairesel Testere Aksesuarları

en: Jigsaw Accessories
xx: Jigsaw Accessories
cs: Příslušenství k lupínkovým pilám
da: Tilbehør til dekupørsave
de: Laubsägenzubehör
es: Accesorios para sierras de vaivén
fr: Accessoires pour scies sauteuses
it: Accessori per seghetti
ja: ジグソー関連用品
nl: Accessoires voor decoupeerzagen
no: Tilbehør til løvsager
pl: Akcesoria do wyrzynarek
pt: Acessórios para serra tico-tico
ru: Принадлежности для струбцин
sv: Figursågstillbehör
tr: Oyma Testeresi Aksesuarları

en: Miter Saw Accessories
xx: Miter Saw Accessories
cs: Příslušenství k pokosovým pilám
da: Geringsav – tilbehør
de: Kreissägenzubehör
es: Accesorios para sierras ingletadoras
fr: Accessoires pour scies à onglets
it: Accessori per seghe circolari
ja: マイターソー関連用品
nl: Accessoires voor verstekzagen
no: Gjæresagtilbehør
pl: Akcesoria do ukośnic
pt: Acessórios para serra de esquadria
ru: Принадлежности для торцовочных пил
sv: Tillbehör till geringsågar
tr: Gönye Burun Testere Aksesuarları

en: Table Saw Accessories
xx: Table Saw Accessories
cs: Příslušenství ke stolovým pilám
da: Bordsav – tilbehør
de: Tischsägenzubehör
es: Accesorios para sierras de mesa
fr: Accessoires pour scies sur table
it: Accessori per seghe da tavolo
ja: テーブルソー関連用品
nl: Accessoires voor tafelzagen
no: Tilbehør til bordsager
pl: Akcesoria do pił stołowych
pt: Acessórios para cavalete de serrador
ru: Принадлежности для циркулярных станков
sv: Tillbehör till bänkcirkelsågar
tr: Masa Testeresi Aksesuarları

en: Shaper Accessories
xx: Shaper Accessories
cs: Příslušenství k obrážečkám
da: Profilfræser – tilbehør
de: Zubehör für Stoßmaschinen
es: Accesorios para limadora
fr: Accessoires pour toupies
it: Accessori per limatrici
ja: シェーパー関連用品
nl: Bovenfreesaccessoires
no: Shaper-tilbehør
pl: Akcesoria do strugarek poprzecznych
pt: Acessórios para limadoras
ru: Принадлежности для формообработки
sv: Tillbehör till kipphyvlar
tr: Planya Tezgahı Aksesuarları

en: Shaper Cutters
xx: Shaper Cutters
cs: Obráběcí nože
da: Profilfræserjern
de: Stoßmaschinenwerkzeuge
es: Fresa perfiladora
fr: Fraises de toupie
it: Coltelli stozzatori limatrice
ja: シェーパーカッター
nl: Bovenfreesmachines
no: Shaper-freser
pl: Frezy do kół zębatych
pt: Cortadoras limadoras
ru: Фрезы
sv: Skärstål till kipphyvlar
tr: Planya Tezgahı Bıçakları

en: Soldering Iron Accessories
xx: Soldering Iron Accessories
cs: Příslušenství k pájkám
da: Loddekolbe – tilbehør
de: Zubehör für Lötkolben
es: Accesorios para soldador
fr: Accessoires pour fers à souder
it: Accessori saldatori a stilo
ja: ハンダゴテ関連用品
nl: Soldeerboutaccessoires
no: Loddebolttilbehør
pl: Akcesoria do lutownic
pt: Acessórios para ferros de solda
ru: Принадлежности для паяльника
sv: Tillbehör till lödkolvar
tr: Havya Aksesuarları

en: Soldering Iron Stands
xx: Soldering Iron Stands
cs: Stojan na pájky
da: Loddekolbe – holdere
de: Lötkolbenständer
es: Soporte para soldador
fr: Supports pour fers à souder
it: Supporti saldatori a stilo
ja: ハンダゴテ用スタンド
nl: Standaarden voor soldeerbouten
no: Loddeboltstativer
pl: Stojaki lutownicze
pt: Suportes para soldadora elétrica
ru: Подставки для паяльников
sv: Lödkolvsställ
tr: Havya Stantları

en: Soldering Iron Tips
xx: Soldering Iron Tips
cs: Pájecí hroty
da: Loddespidser
de: Lötkolbenspitzen
es: Puntas para soldador
fr: Pannes pour fers à souder
it: Punte saldatori a stilo
ja: ハンダゴテ用コテ先
nl: Soldeerboutpunten
no: Loddebolttupper
pl: Groty do lutownic
pt: Pontas para ferros de solda
ru: Наконечники для паяльников
sv: Lödkolvsspetsar
tr: Havya Uçları

en: Tool Blades
xx: Tool Blades
cs: Čepele a kotouče
da: Værktøjsklinger
de: Werkzeugklingen & -blätter
es: Hojas o cuchillas
fr: Lames d'outils
it: Lame per attrezzi
ja: 工具替刃
nl: Gereedschapbladen
no: Verktøyblader
pl: Ostrza do narzędzi
pt: Lâminas para ferramentas
ru: Лезвия для инструментов
sv: Verktygsblad
tr: Alet Bıçak Ağızları

en: Cutter & Scraper Blades
xx: Cutter & Scraper Blades
cs: Nože pro řezáky a škrabky
da: Klinger til knive og skrabere
de: Cutter-\, Schaber- & Spachtelklingen
es: Hojas de espátula y cúter
fr: Lames pour cutters et grattoirs
it: Lame a raschietto e frese
ja: カッター・スクレーパー替刃
nl: Snij- en schraapmesjes
no: Blader til skraper og høvler
pl: Ostrza do noży\, przecinaków i skrobaków
pt: Lâminas para cortadores e raspadores
ru: Лезвия для скребков и ножей
sv: Blad till skär- och skrapverktyg
tr: Freze Bıçaklar ve Kazıyıcı Bıçakları

en: Saw Blades
xx: Saw Blades
cs: Pilové kotouče
da: Savklinger
de: Sägeblätter
es: Hojas de sierra
fr: Lames de scie
it: Lame per seghe
ja: のこぎり替刃
nl: Zaagbladen
no: Sagblader
pl: Ostrza do pił
pt: Lâminas para serra
ru: Пильное полотно
sv: Sågklingor
tr: Testere Bıçakları

en: Tool Handle Wedges
xx: Tool Handle Wedges
cs: Klíny do násad nástrojů
da: Kiler til værktøjsskafter
de: Keile für Werkzeuggriffe
es: Chavetas para herramientas
fr: Renforts pour manches d'outils
it: Cunei per manici di utensili
ja: 工具ハンドル用ウェッジ
nl: Wiggen voor gereedschapsstelen
no: Håndtakskiler til verktøy
pl: Kliny do stylisk
pt: Cunhas para cabos de ferramentas
ru: Клинья для рукояток инструментов
sv: Kilar till verktygshandtag
tr: Alet Sapı Kamaları